Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.060

Tangible net worth for money transmitter.

A money transmitter licensed under this chapter shall maintain a tangible net worth, determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, as determined in rule by the director. The director shall require a tangible net worth of at least ten thousand dollars and not more than three million dollars. In the event that a licensee's tangible net worth, as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, falls below the amount required in rule, the director or the director's designee may initiate action under RCW 19.230.230 and 19.230.260. The licensee may request a hearing on such an action under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2010 c 73 s 4; 2003 c 287 s 8.]